North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 7. Child Care Facilities.
§ 110-106.2.
Department of Defense-certified child care facilities.

As used in this section, the phrase “Department of Defense-certified child care facility” shall include child development centers, family child care homes, and school-aged child care facilities operated aboard a military installation under the authorization of the United States Department of Defense (Department of Defense) certified by the Department of Defense.

Procedure Regarding Department of Defense-Certified Child Care Facilities. —

Department of Defense-certified child care facilities shall file with the Department a notice of intent to operate a child care facility in a form determined by the Department of Defense.

As part of its notice, each Department of Defense-certified child care facility shall file a report to the Department indicating that it meets the minimum standards for child care facilities as provided by the Department of Defense.

Department of Defense-certified child care facilities that meet all the requirements of this section shall be exempt from all other requirements of this Article and shall not be subject to licensure.

For purposes of the North Carolina Subsidized Child Care Program, Department of Defense-certified child care facilities shall be reimbursed as follows:

Department of Defense-certified child care facilities that are accredited by the National Association for the Education of Young Children (NAEYC) shall be reimbursed based on the five-star-rated license rate.

All other Department of Defense-certified child care facilities shall be reimbursed based on the four-star-rated license rate.

History.

2015-241, s. 12B.9(a).

§ 110-107.
Fraudulent misrepresentation.

A person, whether a provider or recipient of child care subsidies or someone claiming to be a provider or recipient of child care subsidies, commits the offense of fraudulent misrepresentation when both of the following occur:

With the intent to deceive, that person makes a false statement or representation regarding a material fact, or fails to disclose a material fact.

As a result of the false statement or representation or the omission, that person obtains, attempts to obtain, or continues to receive a child care subsidy for himself or herself or for another person.

If the child care subsidy is not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), the person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. If the child care subsidy is more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), the person is guilty of a Class I felony.

As used in this section:

“Child care subsidy” means the use of public funds to pay for day care services for children.

“Person” means an individual, association, consortium, corporation, body politic, partnership, or other group, entity, or organization.

History.

1999-279, s. 1.

§ 110-108.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2002-126, s. 10.58, effective July 1, 2002.

§ 110-109.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 21.73(a), effective July 1, 2001.

§§ 110-110 through 110-114.

Reserved for future codification purposes.